Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 3. State Board of Education
§ 21-2-304.
Duties of the state board of education.

The state board of education shall:

Establish policies for public education in this state consistent with the Wyoming Constitution and statutes and may promulgate rules necessary or desirable for the proper and effective implementation of this title and its responsibilities under this title. Nothing in this section shall give the state board rulemaking authority in any area specifically delegated to the state superintendent;

Through the evaluation and accreditation of school districts, implement and enforce the uniform standards for educational programs prescribed under W.S.

21-9-101

and

21-9-102

in the public schools of this state, including any educational institution receiving any state funds except for the University of Wyoming and Wyoming community colleges, and implement and enforce the statewide education accountability system pursuant to W.S.

21-2-204

. The board shall ensure that educational programs offered by public schools in accordance with these standards provide students an opportunity to acquire sufficient knowledge and skills, at a minimum, to enter the University of Wyoming and Wyoming community colleges, to prepare students for the job market or postsecondary career and technical training and to achieve the general purposes of education that equips students for their role as a citizen and participant in the political system and to have the opportunity to compete both intellectually and economically in society. In addition, the board shall require school district adherence to the statewide education accountability system;

By rule and regulation and in consultation and coordination with local school districts, prescribe uniform student content and performance standards for the common core of knowledge and the common core of skills specified under W.S.

21-9-101

(b), and promulgate uniform standards for programs addressing the special needs of student populations specified under W.S. 21-9-101(c) that ensure these student populations are provided the opportunity to learn the common core of knowledge and skills as prescribed by the uniform student content and performance standards pursuant to this paragraph. Student content and performance standards prescribed under this paragraph shall include standards for graduation from any high school within any school district of this state. The ability to prescribe content and performance standards shall not be construed to give the state board of education the authority to prescribe textbooks or curriculum which the state board is hereby forbidden to do. Graduation standards imposed under this paragraph shall require the successful completion of the following components, as evidenced by passing grades or by the successful performance on competency-based equivalency examinations:

Four (4) school years of English;

Three (3) school years of mathematics;

Three (3) school years of science, one (1) year of which may be satisfied by one (1) year of computer science; and

Three (3) school years of social studies, including history, American government and economic systems and institutions, provided business instructors may instruct classes on economic systems and institutions.

In consultation with local school districts, establish requirements for students to earn a high school diploma as evidenced by course completion and as measured by each district’s assessment system prescribed by rule and regulation of the state board and required under W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xxiv). Once every five (5) years and on a staggered basis, the state board shall through the department, review and approve each district’s assessment system designed to determine the various levels of student performance as aligned with the uniform state standards and the attainment of high school graduation requirements as evidenced by course completion. In addition and following review, refinement and revision of student content and performance standards adopted under paragraph (a)(iii) of this section and reviewed under subsection (c) of this section, the board shall establish a process to ensure district assessment systems are aligned with the refined and revised standards within three (3) full school years following adoption of revised standards;

through (C) Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 179, § 3.

Through the state superintendent and in consultation and coordination with local school districts, implement a statewide assessment system comprised of a coherent system of measures that when combined, provide a reliable and valid measure of individual student achievement for each public school and school district within the state, and the performance of the state as a whole. Statewide assessment system components shall be in accordance with requirements of the statewide education accountability system pursuant to W.S.

21-2-204

. Improvement of teaching and learning in schools, attaining student achievement targets for performance indicators established under W.S. 21-2-204 and fostering school program improvement shall be the primary purposes of statewide assessment of student performance in Wyoming. The statewide assessment system shall:

Measure individual student performance and progress in a manner substantially aligned with the uniform educational program and student content and performance standards imposed by law and by board rule and regulation;

Effective school year 2017-2018, and each school year thereafter, be administered in specified grades aligned to the student content and performance standards, specifically assessing student performance in English language arts and mathematics in grades three (3) through ten (10). In addition, the statewide assessment system shall assess student performance in science in grades four (4), eight (8) and ten (10);

Measure student performance in Wyoming on a comparative basis with student performance in other states;

Measure year-to-year changes in student performance and progress in the subjects specified under subparagraph (a)(v)(B) of this section. The assessment system shall ensure the student performance measurements used at each grade level are valid for the purposes for which they are being used, including valid year-to-year comparisons of student and school level results, and shall be sufficient to produce necessary data to enable application of measures of performance indicators as required under W.S. 21-2-204;

Include interim assessments aligned to the statewide content and performance standards and the statewide summative assessment. The interim assessments required by this subparagraph shall be optional for school districts to administer as a part of the district assessment system. The state board shall ensure results from the optional interim assessments are provided to school districts as soon as possible after completion of an interim assessment. All item types used on the statewide student summative assessment shall be included in interim assessments to the extent practical within the reporting timeline;

Provide a fair and unbiased assessment of student performance without regard to race, ethnicity, limited English proficiency and socioeconomic status;

Provide appropriate accommodations or alternative assessments to enable the assessment of students with disabilities as specified under W.S. 21-9-101(c)(i) and students with limited English proficiency;

Provide a measure of accountability to enhance learning in Wyoming and in combination with other measures and information, assist school districts in determining individual student progress as well as school level achievement, growth and readiness targets. In addition to reporting requirements imposed under W.S. 21-2-204, the assessment results shall be reported to students, parents, schools, school districts and the public in an accurate, complete and timely manner. For schools with students enrolled in full-time virtual education programs, assessment results for students attending full-time virtual education programs shall be reported in aggregate form and separate from students physically attending class in a school facility. Assessment results shall be used in conjunction with each school district’s assessments to design educational strategies for improvement and enhancement of student performance required under W.S. 21-2-204. Assessment results shall also be used to guide actions by the state board and the department in providing and directing a progressive system of support and intervention to districts in developing school improvement plans in response to student performance to attain target levels measured and established under W.S. 21-2-204. In consultation and coordination with school districts, the board shall subject to W.S. 21-2-204, review and evaluate the assessment system regularly and based upon uniform statewide reports, annually report to the legislature as required under W.S. 21-2-204;

Require no more than one percent (1%) of the total pupil-teacher contact time, as defined by the state board for each school year, for student participation in a nonaccommodated administration of the statewide summative assessment. The statewide summative assessment shall be administered as late as practical in the instructional year and shall be administered to allow for the return of results in sufficient time for schools and districts to utilize the results for improvement strategies. To the extent possible, the statewide summative assessment shall be administered utilizing an online platform;

Include a reporting system utilizing best practices to ensure useful, high quality and transparent reports to support improvement strategies.

Subject to and in accordance with W.S. 21-2-204, through the state superintendent and in consultation and coordination with local school districts, by rule and regulation implement a statewide accountability system. The accountability system shall include a technically defensible approach to calculate school level performance indicators as required by W.S. 21-2-204. The state board shall establish performance targets as required by W.S. 21-2-204(e), target levels for an overall school performance rating and for indicator level performance pursuant to W.S. 21-2-204(f), a progressive system of supports and interventions as required by W.S. 21-2-204(h) and a statewide reporting system pursuant to W.S. 21-2-204(j). As part of the statewide accountability system, and for purposes of complying with requirements under the federal Every Student Succeeds Act, the board shall by rule and regulation provide for annual accountability determinations based upon measures imposed by federal law for all schools and school districts imposing a range of educational interventions and supports resulting from accountability determinations;

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 101, § 2.

In addition to subsection (a) of this section and any other duties assigned to it by law, the state board shall:

Repealed by Laws 1997 Special Session, ch. 3, § 302; 1994, ch. 17, § 2.

Enforce the uniform state educational program standards imposed by W.S.

21-9-101

and

21-9-102

and the uniform student content and performance standards established by rules and regulations adopted under subsection (a) of this section, together with student performance indicators established and measured pursuant to W.S.

21-2-204

, by taking appropriate administrative action with the state superintendent, including but not limited to the changing of accreditation status;

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 217, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 190, §§ 2, 5.

Initiate or facilitate discussions regarding the needs of and the means for improving education;

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 190, §§ 2, 5.

Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 17, § 2.

Approve or disapprove alternative scheduling for school districts requesting to operate for fewer than one hundred seventy-five (175) days in school year, but no schedule shall be approved which reduces the minimum pupil-teacher contact time defined by the state board. The state board shall establish by rule for grades kindergarten through twelve (12) minimum pupil-teacher contact time requirements, which may include instruction outside of the physical classroom through virtual education or other equivalent methods the state board deems appropriate;

Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 17, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 34, § 2.

through (xiii) Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 17, § 2.

Based upon student performance levels determined under W.S.

21-2-204

, establish improvement goals for public schools for assessment of student progress based upon the national assessment of educational progress testing program and the statewide assessment system established under paragraph (a)(v) of this section;

Promulgate rules and regulations for the submission and approval of comprehensive school district teacher performance evaluation systems. The state board shall, in consultation with local school districts, establish general criteria for school district teacher performance evaluation systems that provide school districts flexibility in designing teacher evaluations to improve classroom instruction;

Not later than July 1, 2018, promulgate rules and regulations for implementation and administration of a comprehensive performance evaluation system for school and district leadership, including superintendents, principals and other district or school leaders serving in a similar capacity. The performance evaluation system shall identify professional standards prescribed by board rule and regulation. The system shall also allow districts opportunity to refine the system to meet the individual needs of each district. Any alternative leader evaluation system shall be approved by the state board, through the department, before adoption;

Through the state superintendent, implement, administer and supervise education programs and services for adult visually handicapped and adult hearing impaired persons within the state.

The state board shall perform an ongoing review of state board duties prescribed by law and may make recommendations to the legislature on board duties. In addition and not less than once every nine (9) years, the board shall evaluate and review the uniformity and quality of the educational program standards imposed under W.S.

21-9-101

and

21-9-102

and the student content and performance standards promulgated under paragraph (a)(iii) of this section. The state board, in consultation with the state superintendent, shall establish a process to receive input or concerns related to the student content and performance standards from stakeholders, including but not limited to parents, teachers, school and district administrators and members of the public at large, at any time prior to the formal review by the state board. The state board shall report findings and recommendations to the joint education interim committee of the legislature on or before December 1 of the year in which the formal review and evaluation of the student content and performance standards was undertaken. The joint education interim committee shall report its recommendations, based upon findings and recommendations of the state board, to the legislature during the immediately following legislative session.

Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 17, § 2.

In addition to subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the state board shall establish statewide goals for Wyoming public education.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 127, §§ 15, 17, 24, 26, 28, 29; C.S. 1920, §§ 2342, 2344, 2351, 2353, 2355, 2356; R.S. 1931, §§ 99-113, 99-115, 99-122, 99-124, 99-126, 99-127; C.S. 1945, §§ 67-114, 67-116, 67-123, 67-125, 67-127, 67-128; W.S. 1957, §§ 21-13, 21-15, 21-22, 21-24, 21-26, 21-27; Laws 1959, ch. 109, §§ 3, 5-7; 1969, ch. 111, § 14; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-14; Laws 1971, ch. 244, § 1; 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1975, ch. 152, § 1; 1977, ch. 56, § 1; 1985, ch. 122, § 1; 1987, ch. 190, §§ 2, 5; 1990, ch. 122, § 1; 1992, ch. 65, § 1; 1993, ch. 56, § 1; ch. 217, § 3; ch. 219, § 1; 1994, ch. 17, §§ 1, 2; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, §§ 301(a), 302; 1999, ch. 188, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 58, § 1; 2004, ch. 109, § 1; 2006, ch. 34, § 2, ch. 114, § 1; 2011, ch. 182, § 1, ch. 184, §§ 2, 3; 2012, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2013 ch. 167, §§
1, 2, effective March 13, 2013; 2013 ch. 195, §§ 1, 2, effective March 13, 2013; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015; 2015 ch. 99, § 1, effective March 2, 2015; 2015 ch. 122, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2015 ch. 179, §§
2, 3, effective March 9, 2015; 2016 ch. 113, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 61, § 1, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 95, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 193, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 69, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2018 ch. 123, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 109, § 1, effective February 26, 2019; 2021 ch. 66, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to powers and duties with respect to children with disabilities, see §

21-2-502

.

As to approval of cooperative educational services agreements, see §

21-20-104

.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, rewrote (a)(v), specifying requirements for the statewide assessment of student performance; and added (a)(vi), establishing a statewide accountability system for the state, school districts and schools with respect to student performance.

The 2006 amendments. —

The first 2006 amendment by ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2006, repealed former (b)(x), which read, “License private schools as provided under W.S.

21-2-401

through

21-2-407

.”

The second 2006 amendment by ch. 114, § 1, substituted “21-3-110(a)(xxiv)” for “21-3-110(a)(xxii)” in (a)(iv).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Pursuant to the conflicting laws provision in ch. 114, both have been given effect in the section as set out above.

The 2011 amendments. —

The first 2011 amendment, by ch. 182, § 1, effective July 1, 2012, rewrote (b)(xv), basing teacher performance evaluations on student achievement, and providing opportunities for mentoring and other professional development activities to unsatisfactory teachers.

The second 2011 amendment, by ch. 184, §§ 2 and 3, in (a)(ii), added “and implement and enforce the statewide education accountability system pursuant to W.S.

21-2-204

,” and added the present last sentence; in the introductory language of (a)(v), added the present second sentence, and added “attaining student achievement targets for core indicators established under W.S.

21-2-204

” in the present third sentence; in (a)(v)(B), deleted “writing” after “performance in reading,” deleted “and through assessments administered periodically over the course of the school year which are designed to provide a more comprehensive and in-depth measurement of subject areas aligned to the state content and performance standards,” and deleted the former last sentence which read: “The assessment system may also measure the other common core of knowledge and skills established under W.S. 21-9-101(b) which can be quantified”; in (a)(v)(D), added “link student performance and progress to teachers of record,” and added “and shall be sufficient to capture necessary data to enable application of measures of core indicators as required under W.S. 21-2-204”; in (a)(v)(E), deleted “and open-ended testing such as constructed-response, extended-response and performance-based tasks” after “multiple choice”; in (a)(v)(H), deleted “teaching and” after “to enhance,” added “as well as school level achievement targets,” added “In addition to reporting requirements imposed under W.S. 21-2-204,” substituted “required under W.S. 21-2-204” for “This design for improvement shall be part of each district's school improvement plan,” added the present fourth sentence, added “subject to W.S. 21-2-204,” substituted “annually report to the legislature as required under W.S. 21-2-204” for “from each district, annually report to the legislature on student performance at specified grade levels and on school improvement plans,” and made stylistic and related changes; substituted (a)(vi) for the former introductory language of former (a)(vi), which read: “Effective school year 2005-2006 and each school year thereafter, through the state superintendent and in consultation and coordination with local school districts, by rule and regulation establish a statewide accountability system providing annual accountability determinations for all schools and school districts imposing a range of educational consequences resulting from accountability determinations whereby”; repealed former (a)(vi)(A) through (a)(vi)(E), which read: “The continuous improvement of student achievement at all schools and appropriate educational interventions fostering continuous improvement serve as the basis for statewide accountability system design; (B) Annual accountability determinations within the system are made for each school based upon adequate yearly progress measures defined by the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001, as may be subsequently amended, and the school's progress in improving student achievement as measured by adequate yearly progress data and by data from the district's body of evidence assessment system required under W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xxiv) and from other related sources which improve the reliability of accountability determinations as prescribed by rule and regulation of the board; (C) To the extent possible, appropriate consequences resulting from accountability determinations are made subject to the discretion of school districts. The system shall establish a range of consequences which increase in the degree of intensity over time, with significant interventions imposed only upon repeated failure to meet school improvement and performance criteria over a consecutive period of time; (D) Teacher and administrator quality and student remediation are the focus of consequences imposed upon schools failing to meet school improvement and performance criteria and target levels; (E) A range of rewards is provided to schools meeting school improvement and performance criteria at levels set by the state board”; added (a)(vii); in (b)(ii), added “together with student performance indicators established and measured pursuant to W.S. 21-2-204; and in (b)(xiv), added “Based upon student performance levels determined under W.S. 21-2-204,” and made related changes.

Laws 2011, ch. 184, § 8 provides: “(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this section, this act is effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2011.

“(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, W.S. 21-2-304(a)(v)(B) and (E), as amended by section 2 of this act, is effective July 1, 2012.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in the introductory language of (a)(iv), inserted the present first and third sentences and “The board shall also” at the beginning of the second sentence, and deleted “body of evidence” following “each district's” in the second sentence; substituted “performance” for “core” in (a)(v); rewrote (a)(v)(B), which formerly read: “Be administered at appropriate levels at specified grades and at appropriate intervals aligned to the standards, specifically assessing student performance in reading and mathematics at grades four (4), eight (8) and eleven (11), and effective school year 2005-2006, and each school year thereafter, assessing student performance in reading and mathematics at grades three (3) through eight (8) and at grade eleven (11). In addition and commencing school year 2007-2008 and each school year thereafter, the statewide assessment system shall assess student performance in science not less than once within each grade band for grades three (3) through five (5), grades six (6) through eight (8) and grades ten (10) through twelve (12). The structure and design of the assessment system shall allow for the comprehensive measurement of student performance through assessments that are administered each school year simultaneously on a statewide basis”;
rewrote (a)(v)(D), which formerly read: “Measure year-to-year changes in student performance and progress in the subjects specified under subparagraph (a)(v)(B) of this section, link student performance and progress to teachers of record and compare and evaluate student achievement during the process of student advancement through grade levels. The assessment system shall ensure the integrity of student performance measurements used at each grade level to enable valid year-to-year comparisons and shall be sufficient to capture necessary data to enable application of measures of core indicators as required under
W.S.

21-2-204

”;
rewrote (a)(v)(E), which formerly read: “Include multiple measures and item types including grade appropriate multiple choice to ensure alignment to the statewide student content and performance standards”; in (a)(v)(H), inserted “growth and readiness” in the first sentence, substituted “each school district's assessments” for “school district's annual assessment” in the third sentence, and substituted the fourth sentence for the former one which read: “Assessment results shall also be used to guide actions by the state board and the department in providing and directing intervention and technical assistance to districts in developing school turn-around plans in response to student performance target indicators measured and established under
W.S.

21-2-204

”; in (a)(vi), inserted the present second and third sentences, and inserted “and supports” in the last sentence; repealed former (a)(vii), pertaining to statewide standards; rewrote (b)(xv), which formerly read: “Promulgate rules and regulations for the development, assessment and approval of annual school district teacher performance evaluation systems based in part upon defined student academic growth measures as prescribed by law and upon longitudinal data systems linking student achievement with teachers of record, clearly prescribing standards for satisfactory and unsatisfactory performance. Rules and regulations adopted under this paragraph shall to the extent student achievement measures are not compromised, provide district ability to include a portion of an evaluation system designed to address the individual needs of the district. The performance evaluation system shall also include reasonable opportunity for district provision of mentoring and other professional development activities made available to teachers performing unsatisfactorily, which are designed to improve instruction and student achievement”; and added (b)(xvi) and redesignated former (b)(xvi) as (b)(xvii).

The 2013 amendments. —

The first 2013 amendment, by ch. 1, § 2, added “or the director” at the end of (a)(i); and substituted “director” for “state superintendent” throughout the section.

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const.
Approved January 29, 2013.

The second 2013 amendment, by ch. 167, §§ 1, 2, in (b)(xv), in the first sentence, substituted “2016” for “2013,” substituted “a comprehensive school district” for “an annual school district” and
“language beginning “and upon measures of professional practice” for “linking student achievement with teachers of record” at the end, and in the second sentence, added “performance, effective performance, performance in need of improvement” before “and ineffective performance” and deleted “and define teacher of record for purposes of the teacher and school district leader evaluation and accountability system” thereafter; and in (b)(xvi), substituted “2015” for “2013” and “a comprehensive performance” for “an annual performance” in the first sentence and added the language beginning “be based in part upon defined student academic performance measures” and ending “meet the individual needs of the district and shall”; in (a)(v)(D), substituted “by school year 2015-2016, link student performance and progress” for “an not later than school year 2013-2014, link student performance and progress to teachers of record” in the first sentence, and in the second sentence, deleted “integrity of” before “student performance,” substituted “are valid for the purposes for which they are being used, including valid year-to-year comparisons of student and school level results” for “to enable valid year-to-year comparisons” and substituted “produce” for “capture.”

Laws 2013, ch. 167, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 13, 2013.

The third 2013 amendment, by ch. 195, §§ 1, 2, added “reading and mathematics for” in the first sentence, rewrote the third sentence, and added “through the department” at the beginning of the fourth sentence; in (a)(v)(E), in the first sentence, substituted “Use only multiple choice items” for “Include multiple measures” and deleted “including multiple choice items” after “performance standards”; and in (a)(vi), added “and equity” in the second sentence, added “through the director” in the third sentence, and made stylistic and related changes.

Laws 2013, ch. 195, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 13, 2013.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2015 amendments. —

The first
2015 amendment, by ch. 30, § 1, substituted “state superintendent” for “director” in (a)(v), (a)(vi), (b)(ii), and (b)(xvii); in (a)(i), deleted “or the director” at the end; and in the third sentence in (a)(vi), deleted “through the director” following “The state board” and made a related change.

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The second
2015 amendment, by ch. 99, § 1, in (a)(v)(B), deleted the third sentence through the end; in (a)(v)(E), deleted the former last sentence; and made related changes.

Laws 2015, ch. 99, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

The 2015 third amendment, by ch. 122, § 1, effective July 1, 2015, in (c), substituted “nine (9) years” for “five (5) years” in the first sentence, inserted the present second sentence, added “The state board” at the beginning, inserted “formal” and “of the student content and performance standards” in
the present third sentence, and made related changes.

The fourth
2015 amendment, by ch. 179, § 2, in (a)(iii), added “of” and deleted “and shall describe required performance levels in order to achieve proficiency of the common core of knowledge and common core of skills prescribed under
W.S. 21-9-101(b).” in the second sentence, rewrote (a)(iv), in (b)(xv) substituted “2019” for “2016” and in (b)(xvi), substituted “2018” for “2015.”

Laws 2015, ch. 179, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2015.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, at the beginning of (a)(iv), deleted “Effective school year 2013–2014, and each school year thereafter, require district administration of common benchmark adaptive assessments statewide in reading and mathematics for grades one (1) through eight (8) in accordance with
W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xxiv). The board shall also establish,” and inserted “establish” in the present first sentence; in (a)(v)(B), in the first sentence, substituted “2017–2018” for “2012–2013,” “English language arts” for “reading,” and “ten (10)” for “eight (8),” and in the second sentence substituted “eight (8) and ten (10)” for “and eight (8)”; rewrote (a)(v)(C), which formerly read, “In addition to subparagraph (a)(v)(B) of this section, measure student performance in Wyoming on a comparative basis with student performance nationally”; in (a)(v)(D), substituted “2018–2019” for “2015–2016”; rewrote (a)(v)(E), which formerly read, “Use only multiple choice items to ensure alignment to the statewide content and performance standards”; added (a)(v)(J) and (a)(v)(K); and made stylistic changes in (a)(v)(B).

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 61, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, rewrote the second and third sentences of (b)(xvi), which read: “The performance evaluation system shall be based in part upon defined student academic performance measures as prescribed by law, upon longitudinal data systems and upon measures of professional practice according to standards prescribed by board rule and regulation. The system shall also allow districts opportunity to refine the system to meet the individual needs of the district and shall include reasonable opportunity for state and district provision of mentoring and other professional development activities made available to district administrative personnel performing unsatisfactorily, designed to improve leadership, management and student achievement,” added the last sentence, and made related changes.

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 61, § 2, effective July 1, 2017, at the end of the first sentence of (a)(v)(D), deleted “and by school year 2018-2019, link student performance and progress to school and district leaders, including superintendents, principals and other district or school leaders serving in a similar capacity.”

The third
2017 amendment, by ch. 95, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(v), substituted “and interventions” for “and consequences” in the third sentence; substituted “As part of the statewide accountability system, and for purposes of complying with requirements under the federal Every Student Succeeds Act” for “In addition and for purposes of complying with requirements under the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001” near the middle of the paragraph; deleted “adequate yearly progress” preceding “measures” and substituted “Interventions” for “consequences” in the last sentence; and updated section references throughout.

The fourth
2017 amendment, by ch. 193, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(v)(H) added the third sentence.

While no amendment gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2018 amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment, by ch. 69, § 1, effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(vi), substituted “calculate school level performance indicators as required” for “calculate achievement, growth, readiness and equity as required” in the second sentence, added “For schools other than alternative schools” in the fourth sentence, and added the fifth sentence.

The second 2018 amendment, by ch. 123, § 1, effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(iii)(C), inserted “one (1) year of which may be satisfied by one (1) year of computer science.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other(s), both(all) have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b)(xv), made numerous stylistic changes regarding establishing general criteria for school district teacher performance evaluation systems.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 66, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "career" for "vocational" following "postsecondary" in the second sentence of (a)(ii).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, added “minimum” following “reduces the,” added the second sentence and made a related change.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 201, effective July 1, 1997, provides: “In fulfilling its responsibility imposed by the Wyoming supreme court under Campbell County School District No. 1, et al., v. State of Wyoming, et al., (907 P.2d. 1238, Wyo., 1995), for establishing a school finance system which ensures each Wyoming student an opportunity to receive a proper education and which also assures the availability of adequate school buildings and facilities for the delivery of the proper education, the legislature directs activities and actions specified within this part [Part II of the act] in order to commence the implementation of the finance system and to assist continued development and final completion of this system.”

Laws 2006, ch. 44, § 1, effective July 1, 2006, provides:

“(a) The department of education is authorized an additional part-time position for purposes of providing research, analysis and other policy-related assistance to the Wyoming board of education in carrying out duties prescribed by W.S.

21-2-304

and otherwise by law. For the biennial period commencing July 1, 2006, and ending June 30, 2008, one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of education for this position.

“(b) On or before January 1, 2008, the Wyoming board of education and the state superintendent of public instruction shall jointly report to the select management audit committee and to the joint appropriations committee on the part-time position filled under this act, and the status of this position and shall present a recommendation as to future funding of this position.”

The federal No Child Left Behind Act, is found at 20 USCS § 6301 et seq.

Laws 2018, ch. 123, § 4, provides: “Amendments to
W.S.

21-2-304

and

21-16-1307

contained in this act shall only apply to those students graduating high school on or after July 1, 2018.”

Laws 2018, ch. 123, § 5, provides: “To the extent this act conflicts with 2018 House Bill 53, this act shall be given precedence and shall prevail over any conflicting provision.”

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2004, ch. 109, § 2, authorizes the statewide task force established by Laws 2003, ch. 208, § 201, and the state superintendent to continue the development, design and oversight of the implementation of the statewide assessment system prescribed by W.S. 21-2-304(a)(v), as amended by section 1 of this act, to be completed in sufficient time for implementation in the 2005-2006 school year. The assessment system is to measure student progress based upon the uniform educational program established under W.S.

21-9-101
